Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  90.100 to
90.465.
SECTION 2. (1) If, during a  fixed term tenancy, a landlord gives a notice under ORS
90.427 (5) terminating the rental agreement on or after the expiration of the fixed term,  the
tenant may give the tenant’s own notice in writing terminating the rental agreement on  a
date designated on the notice that is  at least 30 days following the date of delivery of the
notice to the landlord.
(2) A termination  notice given by the tenant under this section may terminate the
tenancy during the  fixed term. If a tenant terminates the tenancy under this section, the
landlord may not collect any fee under ORS 90.302 (2)(e) or collect any  unpaid rent that
otherwise would have accrued after:
(a) The date designated in the termination notice; and
(b) The tenant returns possession of the premises.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to fixed term rental agreements  entered
on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2134 (HB 2134-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2134 (HB 2134-A) Page 2